Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE B. FRESH WATER SUPPLY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 6918. ANGELINA COUNTY FRESH WATER SUPPLY DISTRICT NO. 1; TERRITORY

Sec. 6918.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Angelina County Fresh Water Supply District No. 1.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 670 (S.B. 2282), Sec. 2, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 6918.002. ADDITIONAL TERRITORY. On the effective date of the Act enacting this chapter, the territory of the former Angelina County Water Control and Improvement District No. 3, as that territory existed on April 1, 2017, is added to the territory of the district.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 670 (S.B. 2282), Sec. 2, eff. June 12, 2017.